Massachusetts, session 194th, S2488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended in line 18, by inserting after the words “carried on” the following:-
“Dependents of Veterans who meet all eligibility criteria except for the one day residence
in the commonwealth, shall be eligible for benefits under this chapter provided a dependent
provides proof of residency in Massachusetts for no less than one year prior to application of
benefits.
of 1